District of Columbia statutes.
47-891

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Chief Financial Officer” means the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia established by § 1-204.24a.

(2)

“Gross building area” means, with respect to a real property, the product of the land area of the real property multiplied by the maximum floor area ratio allowable under its zoning category as of January 1, 2007 without including transfer development rights or bonus development rights; provided, that in the case of real property formerly owned by the United States of America after January 1, 2007, the term “gross building area” shall mean the foregoing as of the date the real property was first legally zoned under District law.

(3)

“Land area” means, with respect to a real property, the ground square footage of the real property.

(4)

“Southeast Water and Sewer Improvement Benefit District” means the special assessment district established by § 47-892.

(5)

(A)

“Southeast Water and Sewer Improvement Project” means the improvements and upgrades to the storm drainage and water and sewer systems scheduled to be performed starting on or about May 1, 2007, and scheduled to be completed on or about February 15, 2008, on the following streets: Potomac Avenue, S.E., from South Capitol Street to First Street, S.E.; First Street, S.E., from Potomac Avenue, S.E., to I Street, S.E.; N Street, S.E., from South Capitol Street to First Street, S.E.; I Street, S.E., from South Capitol Street to First Street, S.E.; and South Capitol Street from N Street to O Street, S.E.

(B)

The scheduled starting and completion dates set forth in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph are set forth for descriptive purposes only and shall not limit the costs that may be included in the special assessment total collection amount determined under § 47-893(c) based solely on the fact that the costs were incurred before the scheduled starting date or after the scheduled completion date.

History

Jan. 29, 2007, D.C. Law 17-89, § 2(b), 54 DCR 11919

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 17-89 provided that Section 2 shall apply as of October 1, 2007.